Utah statutes.
59-18-108.   Court's power to relieve trustee from restrictions on powers and duties.

This chapter does not affect the power of a court of competent jurisdiction for cause shown and upon petition of the trustee, attorney general, or affected beneficiary, and upon appropriate notice to the affected parties to relieve a trustee from any restrictions on his powers and duties that are placed upon him by the governing instrument or applicable law.

